Hawaii statutes.
§612-26 Use of electronic or other means
for drawing grand and trial juries. Selections of citizens who are subject
to jury duty and drawings of jury lists, may be made by electronic data
processing or any other method to ensure random selection of jurors and
implement the purposes of this chapter. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; am L 1993, c
159, §6; am L 2007, c 122, §17]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next